Washington statutes.
RCW 10.101.080

City moneys.

The moneys under RCW 10.101.050 shall be distributed to each city determined to be eligible under this section by the office of public defense. Ten percent of the funding appropriated shall be designated as "city moneys" and distributed as follows:

(1) The office of public defense shall administer a grant program to select the cities eligible to receive city moneys. Incorporated cities may apply for grants. Applying cities must conform to the requirements of RCW 10.101.050 and 10.101.060.

(2) City moneys shall be distributed in a timely manner to accomplish the goals of the grants.

(3) Criteria for award of grants shall be established by the office of public defense after soliciting input from the association of Washington cities. Award of the grants shall be determined by the office of public defense.

[ 2007 c 59 s 1; 2005 c 157 s 6.]